Utah statutes.
77-24-1.5.   Safekeeping by officer pending disposition -- Records required.

Each peace officer shall:

(1)  hold all property in safe custody:

(a)  until it is received into evidence; or

(b)  if it is not used as evidence, until it can be disposed of as provided in this chapter; and

(2)  maintain a proper record of the property that identifies:

(a)  the owner of the property, if known; and

(b)  the case for which it was taken or received and is being held.



Amended by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

